District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.83

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed under this subchapter, no person shall use the terms “cosmetologist,” “licensed cosmetologist,” “cosmetologist-manager,” “cosmetologist-owner,” or words describing any cosmetology specialty (“manicurist,” “braider,” etc.) that may be defined by the Board with the intent to imply that the person is authorized to perform such services in the District.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.83.